Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5930.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-41.3-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-41.3 entitled
"Automated School-Zone-Speed-Enforcement System Act of 2016" is hereby amended to read as
follows:
31-41.3-3. Automated school-zone-speed-enforcement system authorized and defined.
(a) The state department of transportation and the municipalities of this state are hereby
authorized to operate “automated school-zone-speed-enforcement systems.”
(b) For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) An “automated school-zone-speed-enforcement system” is an automated traffic-speed-
enforcement system operated within one-quarter (¼) three-quarters (3/4) of a mile of any type of
school in the state of Rhode Island;
(2) An “automated traffic-speed-enforcement system” is defined as a system using one or
more vehicle detectors in combination with photography to identify and provide a photographic
image of vehicles which are exceeding the posted speed limit, or the speed limit designated by state
law or regulation, for a given school zone, and may be in fixed or mobile configurations; and
(3) A “school zone” is defined as anywhere within a one-quarter (¼) three-quarters (3/4)
of a mile radius of any type of school in the state of Rhode Island.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000624
========
LC000624 - Page 2 of 3